Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB623.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 29A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Except as allowed under the Kentucky Rules of Criminal Procedure, a person present
during any part of a grand jury proceeding shall not knowingly:
(1) Record any testimony or evidence presented during the proceeding; or
(2) Disclose or disseminate any information gathered while present during a grand
jury proceeding.
Section 2. KRS 29A.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who violates subsection (1) or (2) of KRS 29A.160 is guilty of a
Class B misdemeanor.
(2) Any willful violation of KRS 29A.010 to 29A.330 for which a penalty is not
otherwise provided by statute shall be punishable as a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who violates Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor, unless the person is a public servant as defined in KRS 519.010, in
which case it is a Class D felony.
Section 3. KRS 500.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the prosecution of a felony is not subject to
a period of limitation and may be commenced at any time.
(2) Except as otherwise expressly provided, the prosecution of an offense other than a
felony shall[must] be commenced within one (1) year after it is committed.
(3) (a) For a misdemeanor sex offense when the victim is a minor at the time of the
offense, the prosecution of the offense shall be commenced within ten (10)
years after the victim attains the age of eighteen (18) years.
(b) As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection, "misdemeanor sex offense" means
a misdemeanor offense in:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1765
1. KRS Chapter 510;
2. KRS Chapter 531 involving a minor or depiction of a minor; or
3. KRS 506.010 or 506.030 for attempt to commit or solicitation to
commit:
a. Any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph;
b. Promoting prostitution under KRS 529.040 when the defendant
advances or profits from the prostitution of a minor;
c. Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity under
KRS 529.100;
d. Promoting human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity
under KRS 529.110; or
e. Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree under KRS
530.064(1)(a).
(4) For a misdemeanor violation of Section 1 of this Act, the prosecution of the
offense shall be commenced within ten (10) years after it is committed.
(5) For purposes of this section, an offense is committed either when every element
occurs, or if a legislative purpose to prohibit a continuing course of conduct plainly
appears, at the time when the course of conduct or the defendant's complicity
therein is terminated.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:08 PM Jacketed